Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1122.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5(a)(7) of the act of July 22, 1974 (P.L.589, No.205), known as the Unfair Insurance Practices Act, is amended to read:Section 5. Unfair Methods of Competition and Unfair or Deceptive Acts or Practices Defined.--(a) "Unfair methods of competition" and "unfair or deceptive acts or practices" in the business of insurance means:* * *(7) Unfairly discriminating by means of:(i) making or permitting any unfair discrimination between individuals of the same class and equal expectation of life in 12345678910111213141516171819 the rates charged for any contract of life insurance or of life annuity or in the dividends or other benefits payable thereon, or in any other of the terms and conditions of such contract; [or](ii) making or permitting any unfair discrimination between individuals of the same class and of essentially the same hazard in the amount of premium, policy, fees or rates charged for any policy or contract of insurance or in the benefits payable thereunder, or in any of the terms or conditions of such contract, or in any other manner whatever; [or](iii) making or permitting any unfair discrimination between individuals of the same class and essentially the same hazard with regard to underwriting standards and practices or eligibility requirements by reason of race, religion, nationality or ethnic group, age, sex, family size, occupation, place of residence or marital status. The terms "underwriting standards and practices" or "eligibility rules" do not include the promulgation of rates if made or promulgated in accordance with the appropriate Rate Regulatory Act of this Commonwealth and regulations promulgated by the commissioner pursuant to such act[.];(iv) refusing to issue a suretyship guaranteeing the fidelity of an individual holding a place of public or private trust by reason of the criminal history record of the individual; or(v) making or permitting any unfair discrimination between persons of the same class in the amount of premiums, fees or rates charged for a policy or contract of insurance, in any of the other terms or conditions of a policy or contract of insurance or in any other manner solely by reason of the 20250HB1122PN1250 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 criminal history record of an individual employed by a person.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1122PN1250 - 3 - 123